arb-verbs-lexc.txt
{v@Halaf-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حلف^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HAlaf_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حالف^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@halak_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هلك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Halam-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حلم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@haliE-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هلع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@HaloHal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حلحل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@halohal_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^هلهل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Halum-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حلم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hal~-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hal~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حلف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hal~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حلل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hAm-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هام^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hama$-u_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^همش^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hama$_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حمش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hamak-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^همك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hamal-ui_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^همل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hamar-ui_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^همر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hamas-i_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^همس^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@hAmas_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هامس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HAmaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حامى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hamaz-ui_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^همز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hamid-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حمد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Hamiy-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حمي^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hamoham_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^همهم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Hamolaq_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حملق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@HamuD-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حمض^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Ham~aD_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حمض^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Ham~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حمر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Ham~as_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حمس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Ham~aS_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حمص^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hAn-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هان^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Haniq-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حنق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Haniv-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حنث^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hani}_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^هنئ^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@hanodam_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^هندم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Han~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حنن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Han~aT_1@0}:^ss^حنط^se^		Transitive;
{v@HAq-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حاق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HAq-u_1@0}:^ss^حاق^se^		Transitive;
{v@Haq~ar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حقر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HAr-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حار^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hara$-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^هرش^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haran-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حرن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@haras-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هرس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Harav-iu_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حرث^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@harim-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هرم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@harowal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هرول^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Har~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حرف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Har~aj_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حرج^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Har~ak_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حرك^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Har~ar_1@0}:^ss^حرر^se^		Transitive;
{v@Har~az_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حرز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HAsab_1@0}:^ss^حاسب^se^		Transitive;
{v@Hasad-u_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حسد^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HaSar-iu_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حصر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Has~-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hAtafa_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هاتف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hatak-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هتك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@haTal-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هطل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Hat~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حت^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HavA-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حثا^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hAwad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هاود^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@HAwar_1@0}:^ss^حاور^se^		Transitive;
{v@Hawoqal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حوقل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@haw~a$_1@0}:^ss^هوش^se^		Transitive;
{v@Haw~a$_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حوش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Haw~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حود^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@haw~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^هول^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haw~aq_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حوق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haw~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حور^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haw~aT_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حوط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@HAyad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حايد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hay~ab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^هيب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hay~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حيد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hay~aj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هيج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hay~ar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حير^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hay~A_3@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حيا^se^@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@hAzal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هازل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hazam-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حزم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Hazaq-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حزق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@hazil-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^هزل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Hazin-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حزن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Haz~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haz~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حزب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haz~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^حزم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Haz~an_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^حزن^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jA$-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@ja$im-a_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جشم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAbah_1@0}:^ss^جابه^se^		Transitive;
{v@jabar-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جبر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jabaY-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جبى^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jabun-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جبن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jab~as_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جبس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAd-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAdal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جادل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jadowal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جدول^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jad~-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAE-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jaEojaE_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جعجع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jafA-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جفا^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAfaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جافى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jaf~-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jaf~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جفف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jaHad-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جحد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAhad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاهد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jahar-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jAhar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jahur-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jah~az_1@0}:^ss^جهز^se^		Transitive;
{v@jAlas_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^جالس^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@jalaT-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جلط^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jalax-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جلخ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jalid-a_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جلد^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jalojal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جلجل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jal~-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jal~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جلد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jal~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جلل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAmaE_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جامع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jamaH_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جمح^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jAmal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جامل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jam~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جمل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAnab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جانب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@janaH-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جنح^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jAnas_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جانس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@janaY-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جنى^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jan~ab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جنب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jan~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جنن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAr-u_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^جار^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@jara$-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جرش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAraY_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^جارى^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@jarojar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جرجر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jaru&-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جرؤ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jar~aO_1@0}:^ss^جرأ^se^		Transitive;
{v@jar~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جرب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jar~aE_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جرع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jar~am_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جرم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAs-u_1@0}:^ss^جاس^se^		Transitive;
{v@jasar-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جسر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jas~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jas~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جسم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@javA-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جثا^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@javam-ui_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جثم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAwab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاوب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jAwar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جاور^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jAwaz_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جاوز^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jaw~aE_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جوع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jaw~af_1@0}:^ss^جوف^se^		Transitive;
{v@jaw~az_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جوز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jay~a$_1@0}:^ss^جيش^se^		Intransitive;
{v@jay~af_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^جيف^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@jay~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جير^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jazaE-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جزع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@jAzaf_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^جازف^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@jazaY-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^جزى^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jaz~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@jaz~aE_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^جزع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kA$af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كاشف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@ka$aT-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كشط^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@ka$~-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@ka$~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كشر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kaba$-u_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كبش^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kAbad_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كابد^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kabal-i_1@0}:^ss^كبل^se^		Transitive;
{v@kAbar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كابر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kabas-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كبس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kabat-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كبت^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kabur-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كبر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kab~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kab~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كبل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kab~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كبر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kadaH-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كدح^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kad~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kad~ar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كدر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kad~as_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كدس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kaE~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كعب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kAfaO_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كافأ^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kafar-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كفر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kafokaf_1@0}:^ss^كفكف^se^		Transitive;
{v@kaf~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كفن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kaf~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كفر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kaHat-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كحت^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kahorab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كهرب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kaH~-u_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كح^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kaH~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كحل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kAl-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كال^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kal~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كلل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kal~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كلس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@kam~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^كمل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kam~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^كمم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@kanas-u_1@0}:^ss^كنس^se^		Transitive;
{v@kanaz-i_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^كنز^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
